hypenationFiles/fo_FO/hyph_fo_FO.UTF-8.dic
UTF-8
a1a
á1á
a1b
á1b
a1c
a1d
á1d
a1e
a1f
á1f
a1g
á1g
a1h
á1h
a1i
a1í
a1k
á1k
a1l
á1l
a1m
á1m
a1n
a1p
a1r
á1r
a1s
á1s
a1t
á1t
a1v
á1v
a1z
.a2b
.á2b
.a2c
.a2d
a2d.
a2di
.a2f
.á2f
a2ft
.a2g
.á2g
a2gn
.á2h
a2ir
.a2k
.á2k
a2kr
.a2l
a2l.
.á2l
a2lr
.a2m
a2m.
.á2m
a2ml
.a2n
a2n.
a2nl
a2nr
.a2p
.a2r
a2r.
.á2r
a2rb
a2rð
a2rí
a2rr
a2rt
.a2s
a2s.
.á2s
a2ss
.a2t
.á2t
.a2v
.á2v
a3bá
a3bi
a3bo
a3br
a3bú
.a3da
a3de
á3dr
a3fa
a3fe
a3fl
a3fó
a3ge
a3go
a3gø
a3ke
a3lá
a3le
a3lí
a3ló
.a3ma
a3má
a3me
a3mj
a3mo
a3na
a3no
a3pe
a3rá
a3re
a3ro
a3rú
á3ry
a3ræ
a3se
a3sj
a3sm
a3so
a3só
a3su
a3sv
a3sy
a3sø
a3te
a3th
a3tí
á3tí
a3to
a3tó
a3tr
.a3tu
a3tæ
a3tø
a3va
a3ve
a3ví
.a4bo
.a4br
.a4dam
.a4mat
.a4me
.a4no
.a4to
.a4ví
áa2r
áá2r
áár4in
ab2a
ab2u
ab3ar
ad2a
að2a
áð2a
ad2d
ád2d
að2i
áð2i
ad2ik
ad2m
ad2o
ad2r
að2r
að2s
áð2s
áð2u
að3al
áð3an
að3ar
ad3mi
.að4al
ad4ar
að4ir
.ad4mi
að4u
að5ar.
að5ara
að5arr
að5ur
áð6um
að7ur.
að7uri
adótt9ur.
adr4an
áe2g
ae2l
af2la
af2lo
af2lu
af2s
áfar7ing
aft6ur
aft8ur.
ag2d
ag2g
ág2g
ag2i
ag2na
ag2nu
ag2r
ág2r
ag2s
ag2u
ág2u
ag3a
ág3a
ag3re
ag3rø
ag3se
ag3sk
ag3st
ag3ur
ag4a.
ág4a.
ag4an
ág4an
ag4ar
ag6arð
agd5ar
agd7ar.
ágerð8ar.
agn4ar
ai2n
aí2t
áj2a
ak2a
ák2a
ak2i
ak2k
ak2l
ak2n
ak2s
ak2t
ak2u
ák2u
ak3ar
ak3ka
ak3la
ak3li
ak3tu
ak3ur
ák3ur
ak5ar.
ak5arm
ak5kas
ák5ur.
aka4ra
aka4ri
aka5ris
akk4ur
aku4st
aku6sti
.aku7sti
aku8stis
al2a
ál2a
al2d
ál2d
ál2e
al2em
al2es
ál2f
al2g
ál2g
al2i
ál2i
al2k
ál2k
al2l
ál2m
ál2n
al2o
ál2o
ál2p
al2s
ál2s
al2t
ál2t
al2u
al2v
ál2v
al3ar
ál3ar
al3da
ál3ga
al3in
ál3in
al3is
al3la
al3se
ál3se
al3ti
al3va
ál3va
.al4da
.al4is
.al4la
ál4ma
al4oy
ál4oy
ál4sa
al4ur
.ál4va
ál5ar.
ál5ara
al5dag
al5dan
ál5var
ald5ar
ald7ar.
aleys8ur.
áli4ti
álít7and
álít9andi
all4ar
all6ar.
all6ara
alóg8ar.
alt4in
alt6ing
alv4al
am2a
ám2a
am2b
am2d
am2i
ám2i
am2li
am2m
am2p
am2s
ám2s
am2t
am2u
am3al
ám3al
am3an
am3ar
am3ba
am3bu
ám3in
am3is
am3ma
ám3sk
am3st
am3ta
am3ur
am4að
.am4an
.ám4in
am4me
am5al.
am5als
am5mat
am5ur.
amað9ur.
amb4ur
amband8ið.
ame4ri
amm4an
amm4ar
án2a
an2ar
an2at
an2d
an2e
an2g
an2i
án2i
an2k
án2k
an2n
án2n
an2om
an2or
an2s
án2s
an2t
an2u
an3da
an3dr
an3du
an3eg
an3ga
an3go
án3ir
an3is
an3ne
an3sk
an3ta
an3ti
an3um
án4d
.an4da
an4di
an4sa
an4st
an5dak
an5dal
an5gas
an5nes
an5ska
an5um.
an6di.
an6dið
an6do
ana3da
ana4di
ana5da.
ánað7ar.
and3in
ánd3in
and4is
and4ur
and5að
and5ar
and5ið.
and7að.
and7ar.
ang3la
ang4ar
ang6ar.
ang6ur
ang7ur.
ani5st
ank4an
ank4ar
ann4ar
ann5að
ann6ar.
ann7að.
.ann8að.
anning9ar.
ans4ki
ans5in
ans5kir
ap2a
áp2a
ap2i
ap2r
ap2s
áp2s
ap2u
áp2u
ap3ar
ap5ar.
ap5ara
app4ar
app4ur
ar2a
ár2a
ar2d
ar2g
ar2i
ár2i
ar2k
ar2l
ar2m
ar2n
ár2n
ar2ri
ar2s
ár2s
ar2ta
ar2ti
ar2ts
ar2u
ar2v
ar2ø
ar3af
ar3al
ar3an
ar3da
ar3ga
ar3gi
ar3in
ár3in
ar3is
ar3iu
ar3ki
ar3la
ar3li
ar3ma
ar3na
ar3ni
ar3sa
ar3um
ar3va
ar3vi
ar4ald
ar4ar
ár4ar
ar4gj
.ár4in
ar4iu.
.ar4ki
.ar4ma
ar4mu
.ar4na
ar4un
.ar4va
.ár5ar
ar5ing
ar5inu
ár5inu
ar5kiv
ar5nar
ar5um.
ar6ará
ar6are
ar6arú
ar6arø
.ar6kiv
.ar7kiv.
ara4ba
ára4ka
ara5fl
ára5ge
ara5me
arð6ar
arð6ur
arð7ar.
arð8ur.
arð8uri
ari4as
arí4ið
ari4na
ari4us
arí6ið.
ari6us.
aring8ar.
arm4un
arm5að
arn5ar.
arv4ar
arv6ar.
as2a
ás2a
ás2e
as2et
as2h
as2i
ás2i
as2k
ás2k
as2on
ás2p
as2sa
as2su
as2t
ás2t
as2va
as2øg
as3tr
ask4ar
ask5að
ast4ar
ást4ar
ast5að
ást6ar.
ast7að.
asy4st
at2a
át2a
át2e
at2em
at2er
at2i
át2i
at2l
at2n
at2ol
at2or
at2os
át2r
at2ra
at2ri
at2s
át2s
at2t
át2t
at2u
át2u
at2ú
at3ar
át3ar
át3in
at3la
at4is
.at4la
at4ur
át4ur
at5isk
at5lan
át6ur.
áta4la
ate5ma
ati4on
ati5ón
ati7ón.
ati7óns
ato4ri
ato6rii
atori8inum
atori9ið.
atori9inum.
atr4in
átt4ar
átt5ur
átt6ar.
au3r
au4ra
aus4tr
áv2a
av2ar
av2at
av2d
av2i
áv2i
av2r
av2s
áv2u
av3in
áv3in
av3ir
av3ra
av3st
áv3un
áv4ur
av5ir.
av5ran
áv6urí
avi4ka
ávi4ka
aving8ar.
avning9ar.
b1a
b1l
b1u
.b2a
.b2l
.b2u
ba2d
ba2k
ba2l
ba2m
ba2n
ba2r
bá2r
bá2s
bá2t
ba3ni
ba4na
ba4ro
bak4ka
ban4da
ban4du
ban5di
ban6dal
band6ið.
bar3ta
bar4na
bar4ni
bar5ar
bast8að.
bb2a
bb3ar
be2c
be2d
be2k
be2n
be2r
be2s
be2t
be3to
ber4a.
bes4ar
bi2l
bi2n
bi2o
bi2s
bi2t
bis3ku
bis4ko
bis5kup
.bis6kup
bis7kupu
bj2á
bj4a
bl2a
bl2i
bl2o
bl4að
bo2d
bo2g
bo2l
bó2l
bo2n
bó2n
bo2r
bók4ar
bók6ar.
.bók7ar.
bol4la
br2a
br2e
br2i
br2o
br2u
br2ø
br4un
brú4sa
bs2a
bú2f
bu2k
bu2l
bu2m
bu2n
bu2r
bu2s
bu3la
bú4fl
.bú5fl
bú6fla
bún5að
burð8ar.
by2g
by2l
bygd8ar.
bø2r
c1t
ca2g
ca2n
ca2r
ca4go
can5di
cana6da.
ce2n
cen5tr
cen7tru
.cen8tru
.cen9trum
cent5rum
ci3a
cis3ka
cl2a
cl2e
co2n
ct2i
d1a
ð1a
d1b
ð1b
d1d
ð1d
d1f
ð1f
ð1g
ð1h
d1i
ð1i
d1j
ð1j
d1l
ð1l
d1m
ð1m
d1n
d1o
ð1o
d1r
ð1r
d1s
ð1s
ð1t
d1u
ð1u
d1v
ð1v
.d2a
.ð2a
.d2i
d2i.
d2ið
d2il
d2io
d2ir
d2is
d2iu
.d2j
.d2o
d2o.
.d2r
.ð2r
d2rá
.d2u
d3að
ð3að
d3ai
d3ar
d3dó
ð3in
ð3ir
ð3is
ð3lí
d3ná
ð3ræ
d3se
ð3sj
ð3sk
d3so
ð3sp
d3st
ð3st
d3sy
ð3sy
ð3sý
ð3ul
d3um
d3un
d3up
ð3ur
.d4un
.d4up
ð5ug
ð5um
ð5un
ð5us
da2g
da2k
da2l
ða2l
dá2l
da2m
dá2m
da2n
ða2n
da2p
ða2r
dá2r
da2ra
da2rg
da2rl
da2rn
da2rs
da2t
dá2t
dá2v
da3la
da3mu
ða3ne
.da4la
da4me
.da4mu
da4na
ða4na
da4ra.
dag4ur
dag5an
dag5ar
ðal4da
ðam4an
ðar3ti
ðar4af
ðar5ar
ðar5un
darn6ar.
ðarn6ar.
db2a
ðb2u
ðd2j
dd2s
dd2u
dd3us
dd4a
dd5ar
dd7ars
dda3ra
de2g
de2k
de2l
de2m
de2n
de2o
de2r
de2s
de3mi
de3ri
de3st
de4mo
deild9ar.
del4li
den4ta
di2a
di2d
di2e
di2k
di2ls
di2m
di2n
ði2na
ði2ni
ði2ns
ði2nu
di2on
di2rs
ði2rs
ði2sl
di2t
di3an
di3ka
di3na
di3ta
di3tr
ði4st
did4da
didd8ara
dik4al
din4ga
ðin4ga
din4um
ðin4um
dina7via
ding7ar.
ðing7ar.
ding7arn
ding7ur.
ðing7ur.
dis4ko
ðj2a
ðj2u
ðj3um
dj4u
ðj5um.
ðk2a
ðk2u
ðk3ar
ðl2a
ðl2e
dl2i
ðl2i
ðl3ar
ðl4u
ðl5ar.
ðl5um
ðl5un
ðl7unu
dli4ga
dm2i
dm2u
ðm2u
dm4a
dm4ir
dn2a
dn2i
ðn2i
dn2u
dn3an
dn3ar
dn3in
dnað7ar.
do2k
dó2l
dó2m
do2n
do2p
dó2r
do3ku
dótt8ur.
dr2a
ðr2a
dr2e
dr2i
ðr2i
dr2u
ðr2u
dr3an
dr3in
.dr4an
dr4un
dr5ini
dr5inu
dru4sa
ðs2a
ðs2e
ds2et
ðs2i
ðs2ka
ðs2ku
ðs2l
ds2on
ðs2pr
ðs2ta
ds3k
ðs4in
ds4k.
ðskap8ar.
ðsl5ur
ðt2a
ðt4u
du2g
du2k
du2l
ðu2ls
ðu2na
ðu2ni
du2nu
ðu2nu
du2r
ðu2ra
ðu2rg
ðu2rl
ðu2rs
ðu2ru
du2s
ðu2st
du3la
.du4la
ður3in
dur3vi
ður5in.
dv2i
ðv2i
ðveð9urs
dy2g
dy2l
dý2r
dy2s
dygd8ar.
dø2g
dø2r
døm4is
døm6is.
e1b
e1c
e1d
e1f
e1g
e1h
e1k
e1l
e1m
e1n
e1o
e1r
e1s
e1t
e2d.
.e2f
.e2g
.e2k
e2k.
.e2l
e2l.
e2m.
e2mb
e2mj
.e2n
e2n.
e2ng
e2o.
.e2r
e2r.
e3fo
e3ge
e3go
e3gr
e3kl
e3ko
e3ma
e3me
e3mo
e3mu
e3re
e3se
ea2k
ea2l
ea2s
ea2t
ea3la
ed2a
ed2i
eð2i
eð2l
eð2r
ed3in
eð4u
eð5ur
eð7ur.
eð7urs
ee2n
eg2g
eg2i
eg2l
eg2n
eg2ra
eg2u
eg3a
eg3nu
eg3ur
eg4a.
eg4in
.eg4nu
egg5in
egg7ing
eggj8ar.
egn4um
egn6um.
.egn7um.
ei2d
ei2f
ei2g
ei2k
ei2l
ei2m
ei2n
ei2p
ei2r
ei2s
ei2t
ei2v
ei4gi
ei4le
ei4sa
ei4st
eid4da
eið5in
eið6ur
eið8ur.
eig5ar
eil4da
eild8ar.
ein4ar
ein4as
ein4si
ein5sa
ein5se
ein5st
ein6ar.
ein6ast
ein6sar
.ein7ast
ein8asta
eis4li
eisl7ing
ek2a
ek2k
ek2la
ek2n
ek2s
ek2t
ek2u
ek2v
ek3an
ek3ar
ek3ni
ek4sm
ek4un
ek5nik
ekj5ar
ekj5ur
ekning9ar.
ekt4ar
ekt6ar.
el2a
el2b
el2d
el2e
el2i
el2l
el2s
el2t
el2v
el3ag
el3dr
el3li
el3se
el3si
el3ta
.el4dr
.el4li
el4sa
el5dri
.el5lin
.el6dri
.el7driv
eld4is
eld6is.
eldr7ini
eldr9ini.
eli5gi
ell4in
ell5ur
em2at
em2i
em2m
em2p
em2s
em2t
em2us
em3in
em3mi
em5ing
ema4ti
en2a
en2d
en2gu
en2i
en2j
en2n
en2s
en2t
en2u
en3in
en3si
en3sk
en3ta
en3ti
en4di
en4sa
en4tr
en5tal
en5til
en6tru
ena4ti
end3in
end4il
end4ir
end4ri
end4ur
end5að
end5ar
end6ur.
end7að.
ending9ar.
enj5ar
enning9ar.
ent4rum
ent5að
ent6rumd
ep2l
er2a
er2d
er2g
er2i
er2j
er2k
er2m
er2n
er2r
er2s
er2t
er2u
er2v
er3a.
er3an
er3in
er3na
er3ni
er3ra
er3vi
er4að
er4mo
er4mu
er4si
er4sk
er4ur
er5ras
er6sin
er6uri
erð4ar
erð5is
erð6ar.
erj5ar
erj7ar.
erk4ar
erk4la
erk5ara
erk5is
erk7arag
erk7is.
ern4is
es2a
es2h
es2i
es2j
es2k
es2s
es2t
es2u
es3ar
es3ir
es3si
es3so
esa4ra
esl4in
esl6ing
est4in
et2a
et2h
et2i
et2j
et2n
et2o
et2r
et2s
et2t
et2u
et3ar
et3in
et4ur
et6ur.
eting8ar.
etr4in
etr5ar
etr5ið
etr7ar.
etri7na.
ett4in
eu2r
eu2t
eu3tr
ev2a
ev2i
ev2j
ev2l
ev2s
ev3ar
ev3in
evning9ar.
ey2g
ey2k
ey2n
ey2s
ey2t
ey2v
ey3ti
eyð6ur
eyð8ur.
eys4ur
eys6ur.
eyst8ur.
eyv4ar
eyv6ar.
f1g
f1l
f1s
.f2l
fa2g
fa2k
fa2l
fa2n
fa2r
fa2s
fa2t
fa4ro
fag4ur
fan4ga
fan4ta
far4in
far4ma
far4vi
far6ing
fe2g
fe2l
fe2r
fe2s
fe2t
fe3ta
ferð7ar.
ff2l
fg2h
fi2k
fi2l
fí2l
fi2m
fi2n
fí2n
fi2r
fi2t
fj2á
fj4a
fjarð9ar.
fl2a
fl2e
fl2i
fl2o
fl2u
fl4un
fl4ur
fle4st
fo2l
fó2l
fo2n
fo2o
fo2r
fo2s
fo2t
for5ar
fr2a
fr2e
fr2i
fr2í
fr2o
fr2u
fr2ø
fr4ið
frið7ar.
.frið8ar.
fro4st
fry4st
fs2t
ft2a
ft2i
ft2r
ft3an
ft3ar
ft3in
ft4ir
ft4is
ft4u
ft5ur
ft7ur.
ft7urs
fting8ar.
fu2g
fu2l
fu2n
fu2r
fú2t
ful4la
fund8ar.
.fund9ar.
fy2g
fy2l
fý2r
fø2r
før4um
før6um.
g1a
g1b
g1d
g1f
g1g
g1h
g1i
g1l
g1m
g1n
g1p
g1r
g1s
g1t
g1u
g1v
g2a.
g2af
g2ar
.g2i
g2i.
g2ió
g2iø
.g2l
g2l.
g2n.
g2no
g2ns
.g2r
g2ró
g2s.
g2sf
g2sg
g2sl
g2sn
g2su
g2t.
.g2u
.g3a
g3að
g3dí
g3dó
g3in
g3is
g3le
g3um
g3un
g4ag
g4al
g4am
.g4an
.g4ar
g4as
g4at
g4av
.g4is
.g4le
.g4um
.g4un
g4aa
.g5arn
.g6arna
ga2ar
ga2b
gá2g
gá2l
ga2ll
ga2lv
ga2ma
ga2n
ga2ra
ga2rd
ga2rg
ga2ri
ga2rk
ga2rl
ga2rm
ga2rn
ga2rs
ga2rv
gá2s
gá2t
gá2v
gá3lo
ga4na
gál4ga
gal4va
gam4al
gam6al.
.gam7al.
gan3ar
gan4da
gan4du
gan6um
gang8ur.
gar3ti
gar4af
gar4va
gar5ar
gar5gj
gar6na
gar7nar
.gar8nar
garn6ar.
.garn7ar.
gát5ur
gati8óns
gáv5ur
gb2l
gd2a
gd2u
gd4ar
gd6ar.
gd6arr
ge2l
ge2n
ge2o
ge2r
ge2s
ge3st
.ge4st
ger4a.
ger4ni
gerð7ar.
gg2i
gg2u
gg3ir
gg4in
gg6ing
ggj4um
ggj5ar
ggj7ar.
gi2f
gi2k
gi2l
gi2m
gi2nd
gi2ni
gi2r
gi2t
gi4st
gil4sk
gimb7ur.
gin4ga
ging7ar.
gj2a
gj2á
gj2u
gj3ár
gj3as
gj3um
gj4ar
.gj4ár
gj6ar.
gjarð9ar.
gl2a
gl2d
gl2en
gl2er
gl2i
gl2o
gl2u
gl3an
gl3ar
gl3in
gl4að
.gl4ar
gl4oy
gla4st
gn2a
gn2u
gn3ar
gn3um
gn5ar.
gn5um.
gning8ar.
go2d
go2g
go2l
gó2l
go2m
go2n
go2r
go2s
go2t
go3ri
go3sl
go3ti
góð5sk
gr2a
gr2e
gr2i
gr2í
gr2o
gr2u
gr2ø
gr4ið
gr4un
gra5na
gróð9ur.
gs2a
gs2e
gs2k
gs2lu
gs2na
gs2p
gs2t
gt2a
gt2i
gu2d
gu2l
gu2na
gu2nd
gu2nu
gu2r
gu2s
gu2t
gu2v
gun4ar
gur3na
gurn6ar.
gv2a
gv2i
gv2u
gv3ar
gv3in
gv3us
gy2k
gy2l
gø2r
ha2e
ha2g
ha2l
há2l
ha2m
ha2n
ha2p
ha2r
há2r
há2s
ha2t
há2t
ha2v
há2v
ha3ni
ha3ra
ha3ri
há3sp
ha4na
.ha4ra
ha5ral
.ha6ral
.ha7rald
.ha8ralds
.ha9raldse
hal4da
hál4va
hal5dar
hal6dan
.hal7dan
ham4ar
han4da
han4dr
han4is
han4ne
han6nes
han8nese
han8ness
har4is
har4ma
har4um
har5ald
har6alds
.har7aldss
hav4ra
he2k
he2l
he2n
he2r
he2s
he2t
he3le
heild9ar.
her4vi
her5að
her5ur
her7uri
her9urin
herð7ar.
hi2g
hi2l
hi2m
hi2n
hi2r
hi2t
hj2á
hj4a
ho2l
ho2m
ho2n
ho2r
hó2v
ho3ma
ho4s
ho5sp
hr2i
hri4na
hri5st
hri6na.
hri7sti
hu2g
hu2l
hu2m
hu2n
hu2r
hu2s
hú2s
hús4ar
hús5in
hv2a
hv2i
hv2u
hva4ga
hva4li
hy2l
hý2r
hæ2l
hø2g
i1a
í1a
i1b
i1c
i1d
i1e
i1f
i1g
i1h
i1i
í1i
i1k
i1l
í1l
i1m
í1m
i1n
í1n
i1o
i1ó
i1p
i1r
i1s
i1t
í1t
i1u
i1v
í1v
i1ø
i2a.
i2al
.i2c
.i2g
í2ið
.i2l
i2l.
.í2l
i2lj
i2lk
i2ln
.í2m
.i2n
i2n.
i2ng
i2nl
i2nn
i2o.
i2p.
i2pi
i2ps
i2pu
i2r.
i2rb
i2rg
i2rl
i2ro
i2s.
i2sd
i2sf
i2sh
i2sk
i2sm
i2sr
i2ss
i2su
.i2t
.í2t
i2u.
.i2v
i2v.
i3ar
i3ch
i3de
i3dr
i3fa
i3fe
i3gi
i3ið
i3ko
i3le
i3lø
i3me
í3me
i3mo
i3my
i3no
í3næ
i3ón
i3po
i3sa
i3si
i3sn
i3st
i3sø
í3tí
i3un
.í4me
ia2d
ia2la
ia2ld
ia2lt
ia2lu
ia2n
ía2n
ia2rk
ia2s
ia2t
ía2t
ia4na
ial5ur
iam4an
ian3ar
ian4sk
ib2a
íb2l
íb3li
id2a
ið2a
íð2a
id2d
ið2i
íð2i
ið2j
ið2l
id2n
íd2n
ið2r
íð2r
id2ri
ið2s
íð2s
íð2u
ið3al
ið3an
ið3ar
íð3ar
id3da
ið3li
ið4in
ið4is
ið4u
ið5ar.
íð5ar.
ið5ur
ið7ur.
ið7urs
idd6ar
idd7ara
iðing8ar.
iðj4um
iðl4ar
iðl6un
iðl8unu
ie2l
ie2n
ien4sk
if2s
ig2d
ig2g
íg2g
ig2l
ig2n
ig2u
ig3a
ig3ur
ig4a.
ig4ar
ig4um
ígg5in
ii2n
ii3nu
iin4um
ik2a
ík2a
ik2i
ík2i
ik2k
ik2l
ík2n
ik2s
ík2s
ik2t
ik2u
ik3al
ik3am
ik3an
ik3ar
ík3ar
ik3in
ík3in
ik3st
ik3ur
ík4is
ika4ra
ika4ri
íka4st
iking8ar.
íking8ar.
il2a
íl2a
il2d
íl2e
il2en
il2es
il2i
íl2i
il2l
il2m
il2s
il2t
il2u
íl2u
il2v
il3af
il3ag
íl3ar
il3da
il3sk
il3ta
il3vi
il4sa
il4sl
il4ur
ild4is
ild5ar
ild6is.
ild7ar.
ile4st
ili4ga
ill4um
ill6um.
im2a
im2b
im2d
ím2d
im2i
ím2i
im2m
im2p
im2s
ím2s
im2t
im2u
ím2u
im3an
im3ar
im3il
im3in
im3sp
im3st
im3um
im4að
imb4ur
imb6ur.
imi4nu
ímill8um.
.ímill9um.
imm4ar
in2a
in2e
in2gr
in2gu
in2i
in2j
in2k
in2na
in2ng
in2ni
in2ns
in2nu
in2r
in2s
ín2s
in2t
in2u
ín2u
in3an
in3ar
in3as
in3ga
in3is
in3kv
in3si
in3sk
in3ta
in3ti
in3um
ín3ur
in4al
in4d
